Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2221
Sections; when not applicable.

Sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 shall not apply to any individual or group of individuals within this state who prior to December 25, 1969, were permitted to organize a corporation and perform personal services to the public by the means of a corporation, and sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 shall not apply to any corporations organized by such individual or group of individuals prior to December 25, 1969; Provided, any such individual or group of individuals or any such corporation may bring themselves and such corporation within the provisions of sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 by amending the articles of incorporation in such a manner as to be consistent with all the provisions of sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 and by affirmatively stating in the amended articles of incorporation that the shareholders have elected to bring the corporation within the provisions of sections 21-2201 to 21-2222.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 21, p. 562.